Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.450

Orders—Appeal.

Any licensee or applicant who feels aggrieved by an order of the director may appeal to the superior court of the county in the state of Washington of the residence of the licensee or applicant where the trial on such appeal shall be held de novo.

[ 1991 c 17 s 4; 1959 c 107 s 46.]